Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.740

[Art. 105] Misconduct of a prisoner.

Any person subject to this code who, while in the hands of the enemy in time of war:

(1) For the purpose of securing favorable treatment by his or her captors acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, or regulation, to the detriment of others of whatever nationality held by the enemy as civilian or military prisoners; or

(2) While in a position of authority over such persons maltreats them without justifiable cause;

shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 786; 1963 c 220 s 104.]